hyphenate_patterns/hyph-es-es.tex
radio1a2 radio1e2 radio1i2 radio1o2 radio1u2
radio1Ã¡2 radio1Ã©2 radio1Ã­2 radio1Ã³2 radio1Ãº2
ranco1h
ranco1a2 ranco1e2 ranco1i2 ranco1o2 ranco1u2
ranco1Ã¡2 ranco1Ã©2 ranco1Ã­2 ranco1Ã³2 ranco1Ãº2
.re2a2
.re3e4
.re2i2
.re2o2
.re2u2
.re2Ã¡2
.re2Ã©2
.re2Ã­2
.re2Ã³2
.re2Ãº2
ea3cio.
ea3cios.
ea3cia.
ea3cias.
.re3abr
.re3Ã¡br
.re3abiert
.re3absor
.re3absÃ³r
.re3admis
.re3admit
.re3admÃ­t
.re3afirm
.re3afÃ­rm
.re3agrav
.re3agrÃ¡v
.re3acondic
.re3acuÃ±
.re3acÃºÃ±
.re3ajust
.rea3jÃºst
.re3alegr
.re3alÃ©gr
.rea3liza
.rea3lizÃ¡
.rea3lÃ­za
.re3alim
.rea3lism
.rea3list
.re3aloj
.re3alÃ³j
.re3alq
.re3anim
.re3anÃ­m
.re3ama
.re3Ã¡ma
.re3amÃ¡
.re3ame
.re3Ã¡me
.re3amÃ©
.re3amo
.re3Ã¡mo
.re3amÃ³
.re3aparec
.re3aprend
.re3aprÃ©nd
.re3apret
.reaprÃ­et
.rei3no
.re3ubica
.re3ubÃ­ca
.re3ubicÃ¡
.re3ubico
.re3ubicÃ³
.re3ubiq
.re3ubÃ­q
.reu3mati
.reu3mÃ¡ti
.reu3nir
.reu3nÃ­r
.reu3nia
.reu3nÃ­
.reu3nis
.reunim
.reu3nÃ¡
.reu3nie
.reu3niÃ©
.reu3nid
.reu3niÃ³
.re3unif
.re3usar
.re3usÃ¡r
.re3utiliz
.re3utilÃ­z
.re3a2eg
.re3a2q
.re3a2z
.re3asum
.re3asÃºm
.re3a2grup
.re3i2m
.re3inc
.re3inic
.re3inf
.re3ing
.re3inv
.rei3na
.re3ins
.re3int
.re3o2b
.re3orient
.rei3vind
.re3oc
.re4o3j
.re3orga
.re3unt
.reu3ma
rete1h
rete1a2 rete1e2 rete1i2 rete1o2 rete1u2
rete1Ã¡2 rete1Ã©2 rete1Ã­2 rete1Ã³2 rete1Ãº2
rmano1h
rmano1a2 rmano1e2 rmano1i2 rmano1o2 rmano1u2
rmano1Ã¡2 rmano1Ã©2 rmano1Ã­2 rmano1Ã³2 rmano1Ãº2
retro1h
retro1a2 retro1e2 retro1i2 retro1o2 retro1u2
retro1Ã¡2 retro1Ã©2 retro1Ã­2 retro1Ã³2 retro1Ãº2
romo1h
romo1a2 romo1e2 romo1i2 romo1o2 romo1u2
romo1Ã¡2 romo1Ã©2 romo1Ã­2 romo1Ã³2 romo1Ãº2
salva1h
salva1a2 salva1e2 salva1i2 salva1o2 salva1u2
salva1Ã¡2 salva1Ã©2 salva1Ã­2 salva1Ã³2 salva1Ãº2
seleno1h
seleno1a2 seleno1e2 seleno1i2 seleno1o2 seleno1u2
seleno1Ã¡2 seleno1Ã©2 seleno1Ã­2 seleno1Ã³2 seleno1Ãº2
semi1h
semi1a2 semi1e2 semi1i2 semi1o2 semi1u2
semi1Ã¡2 semi1Ã©2 semi1Ã­2 semi1Ã³2 semi1Ãº2
i2a.
i2as.
2Ã³tic
emi2o2
servo1h
servo1a2 servo1e2 servo1i2 servo1o2 servo1u2
servo1Ã¡2 servo1Ã©2 servo1Ã­2 servo1Ã³2 servo1Ãº2
2seudo1h
2seudo1a2 2seudo1e2 2seudo1i2 2seudo1o2 2seudo1u2
2seudo1Ã¡2 2seudo1Ã©2 2seudo1Ã­2 2seudo1Ã³2 2seudo1Ãº2
o2os.
.so3a4s
sobre1h
sobre1a2 sobre1e2 sobre1i2 sobre1o2 sobre1u2
sobre1Ã¡2 sobre1Ã©2 sobre1Ã­2 sobre1Ã³2 sobre1Ãº2
sobre3a4sa
sobre3a4sas
socio1h
socio1a2 socio1e2 socio1i2 socio1o2 socio1u2
socio1Ã¡2 socio1Ã©2 socio1Ã­2 socio1Ã³2 socio1Ãº2
4a3rio.
4a3rios.
4a3ria.
4a3rias.
3logÃ­a
4Ã³n.
4ones.
4i4er.
4o2ico.
4o2icos.
4o2ica.
4o2icas.
.su2b1h
.su2b2a2 .su2b2e2 .su2b2i2 .su2b2o2 .su2b2u2
.su2b2Ã¡2 .su2b2Ã©2 .su2b2Ã­2 .su2b2Ã³2 .su2b2Ãº2
.sub3acuÃ¡t
.subi3ll
.su3bi3da
.su3bi3dor
.su3bi3do
.su3bi3dÃ³n
.su3basta
.su3bÃ¡sta
.su3bastÃ¡
.su3baste
.su3bÃ¡stÃ©
.su3basto
.su3bÃ¡stÃ³
.sub3Ã­nd
.sub3Ã­mi
.su4b3ray
.sub3acepc
.sub3acet
.sub3aflue
.sub3alcai
.sub3arr
.sub3Ã¡rtic
.sub3atÃ³mic
.sub3ejecut
.sub3elemen
.sub3emple
.sub3enten
.seb3entrad
.sub3espec
.sub3estac
.sub3estim
.sub3estÃ­m
.sub3estruc
.sub3occipit
.sub3ofici
.su3bordin
.su3bordÃ­n
.sub3urba
.sub3aliment
.su3balter
.sub3insp
.sub3intenden
.su3bir
.su3bÃ­r
.su3biÃ©n
.su3bi3mien
.su3bier
.su3bies
.su2r1est
.su2r1oes
supe2r3r
supe2r1h
supe2r1a2 supe2r1e2 supe2r1i2 supe2r1o2 supe2r1u2
supe2r1Ã¡2 supe2r1Ã©2 supe2r1Ã­2 supe2r1Ã³2 supe2r1Ãº2
ra5ra
ra5rÃ¡
ra5re
ra5rÃ©
ra5rÃ­
ra5ro
supe3r4a4r
supe3r4Ã¡4r
supe3r4Ã¡3vit.
supe3r4Ã¡3vits.
super4ior
4a3ciÃ³n.
4a3ciones.
4e3rior.
4e3riores.
4e3riora.
4e3rioras.
4e3riormente.
4e3rioridad.
4e3rioridades.
4e3r4a3ble.
4e3r4a3bles.
4e3r4a3blemente.
pe5r4ante
perpon5d6r
supra1h
supra1a2 supra1e2 supra1i2 supra1o2 supra1u2
supra1Ã¡2 supra1Ã©2 supra1Ã­2 supra1Ã³2 supra1Ãº2
sup6ra
talmo1h
talmo1a2 talmo1e2 talmo1i2 talmo1o2 talmo1u2
talmo1Ã¡2 talmo1Ã©2 talmo1Ã­2 talmo1Ã³2 talmo1Ãº2
tele1h
tele1a2 tele1e2 tele1i2 tele1o2 tele1u2
tele1Ã¡2 tele1Ã©2 tele1Ã­2 tele1Ã³2 tele1Ãº2
4Ã³steo.
4Ã³steos.
tecno1h
tecno1a2 tecno1e2 tecno1i2 tecno1o2 tecno1u2
tecno1Ã¡2 tecno1Ã©2 tecno1Ã­2 tecno1Ã³2 tecno1Ãº2
.tele1imp
.tele1obj
.tele4o3lÃ³t
tera1h
tera1a2 tera1e2 tera1i2 tera1o2 tera1u2
tera1Ã¡2 tera1Ã©2 tera1Ã­2 tera1Ã³2 tera1Ãº2
termo1h
termo1a2 termo1e2 termo1i2 termo1o2 termo1u2
termo1Ã¡2 termo1Ã©2 termo1Ã­2 termo1Ã³2 termo1Ãº2
tetra1h
tetra1a2 tetra1e2 tetra1i2 tetra1o2 tetra1u2
tetra1Ã¡2 tetra1Ã©2 tetra1Ã­2 tetra1Ã³2 tetra1Ãº2
topo1h
topo1a2 topo1e2 topo1i2 topo1o2 topo1u2
topo1Ã¡2 topo1Ã©2 topo1Ã­2 topo1Ã³2 topo1Ãº2
.tra2s1h
.tra2sa2 .tra2se2 .tra2si2 .tra2so2 .tra2su2
.tra2sÃ¡2 .tra2sÃ©2 .tra2sÃ­2 .tra2sÃ³2 .tra2sÃº2
tras1abuel
tras1alcob
tras1alp
tras1altar
tras1andin
tras1atlÃ¡nt
tras1oceÃ¡n
tra3se3ro.
tra3se3ros.
tra3se3ra.
tra3se3ras.
.tra3su3da
.tra3su3dÃ¡
.tra3su3de
.tra3su3dÃ©
.tra3su3do
.tra3su3dÃ³
.tra3sunta
.tra3suntÃ¡
.tra3sunte
.tra3suntÃ©
.tra3sunto
.tra3suntÃ³
.tra3so3Ã±
.tra3se3g
.tra3sieg
tran2s1h
tran2sa2 tran2se2 tran2si2 tran2so2 tran2su2
tran2sÃ¡2 tran2sÃ©2 tran2sÃ­2 tran2sÃ³2 tran2sÃº2
trans3aminas
tran2s1and
tran2s1atl
tran2s1oce
tran2s1ur
tran3sacci
tran3sactiv
tran3seÃºn
tran3se3xu
tran3si3berian
tran3si3cion
tran3si3ciÃ³n
tran3sido.
tran3sidos.
tran3sida.
tran3sidas.
tran3si3gi
tran3si3gÃ­
tran3si3ge
tran3si3ja
tran3si3jÃ¡
tran3si3jo
tran3silvan
tran3sisto
tran3si3ta
tran3si3tÃ¡
tran3si3te
tran3si3tÃ©
tran3si3to
tran3si3tÃ³
tran3si3tiv
tran3si3tori
trans3oraci
tran3subst
tran3sust
.tri1Ã³2x
tropo1h
tropo1a2 tropo1e2 tropo1i2 tropo1o2 tropo1u2
tropo1Ã¡2 tropo1Ã©2 tropo1Ã­2 tropo1Ã³2 tropo1Ãº2
turbo1h
turbo1a2 turbo1e2 turbo1i2 turbo1o2 turbo1u2
turbo1Ã¡2 turbo1Ã©2 turbo1Ã­2 turbo1Ã³2 turbo1Ãº2
ultra1h
ultra1a2 ultra1e2 ultra1i2 ultra1o2 ultra1u2
ultra1Ã¡2 ultra1Ã©2 ultra1Ã­2 ultra1Ã³2 ultra1Ãº2
vice1h
vice1a2 vice1e2 vice1i2 vice1o2 vice1u2
vice1Ã¡2 vice1Ã©2 vice1Ã­2 vice1Ã³2 vice1Ãº2
video1h
video1a2 video1e2 video1i2 video1o2 video1u2
video1Ã¡2 video1Ã©2 video1Ã­2 video1Ã³2 video1Ãº2
xeno1h
xeno1a2 xeno1e2 xeno1i2 xeno1o2 xeno1u2
xeno1Ã¡2 xeno1Ã©2 xeno1Ã­2 xeno1Ã³2 xeno1Ãº2
xero1h
xero1a2 xero1e2 xero1i2 xero1o2 xero1u2
xero1Ã¡2 xero1Ã©2 xero1Ã­2 xero1Ã³2 xero1Ãº2
xilo1h
xilo1a2 xilo1e2 xilo1i2 xilo1o2 xilo1u2
xilo1Ã¡2 xilo1Ã©2 xilo1Ã­2 xilo1Ã³2 xilo1Ãº2
zoo1h
zoo1a2 zoo1e2 zoo1i2 zoo1o2 zoo1u2
zoo1Ã¡2 zoo1Ã©2 zoo1Ã­2 zoo1Ã³2 zoo1Ãº2
wa3s4h
3grafo.
3grafa.
3grafos.
3grafas.
3grafÃ­a.
3grafÃ­as.
o4i3dea.
o4i3deas.
o4i3dal.
o4i3dales.
4o2i3de.
4o2i3des.
4i2dal.
4i2dales.
4i3deo.
4i3deos.
i2o.
i2os.
2i3co.
2i3cos.
2i3ca.
2i3cas.
4e3dro.
4e3dros.
4Ã©3drico.
4Ã©3dricos.
4Ã©3drica.
4Ã©3dricas.
4Ã­3ble.
4Ã­3bles.
3hablante
3habiente
5humano
5humana
3a4ficionad
3a4merican
su2d3a4merican
su2r3a4merican
3e4lectr
3e4lÃ©ctr
di4e5lec
di4e5lÃ©c
5i4ndustr
5islÃ¡mi
5islami
5ingenier
5tÃ©cnic
5biologÃ­a
5cÃ©ntrico
5e4cuatorial
7u4niversid
5u4niversit
}
